Tennessee, session 114, SB1056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-229(a)(4), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(4) Dyslexia screening must be provided to every student.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-229(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(5) If the student is enrolled in grades kindergarten through five (K-5), use the
Orton-Gillingham method for teaching the student.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-229(d), is amended by adding ",
including using the Orton-Gillingham method" after "with dyslexia".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3004(c)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting "using appropriate scientific research and brain-based multisensory intervention
methods and strategies" and substituting "using the Orton-Gillingham method".
SECTION 5. For the purpose of training teachers to use the Orton-Gillingham method,
this act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes,
this act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it, and applies to the
2025-2026 school year and subsequent school years.
SB1056
002029
- 1 -